Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB320.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1308(a) of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1308. Voluntary changes in rates.(a) General rule.--Unless the commission otherwise orders, no public utility shall make any change in any existing and duly established rate, except after 60 days notice to the commission, which notice shall plainly state the changes proposed to be made in the rates then in force, and the time when the changed rates will go into effect. The public utility shall also give such notice of the proposed changes to other interested persons as the commission in its discretion may direct. Such notices regarding the proposed changes which are provided to the 1234567891011121314151617 utility's customers shall be in plain understandable language as the commission shall prescribe. Any communication by a public utility to a utility customer that includes a notification of a proposed rate change shall call attention, in conspicuous type, to the fact tha t a proposed rate change is contained in the mailing on the face of the notice's envelope or on the outside of the mailing if no envelope is used. All proposed changes shall be shown by filing new tariffs, or supplements to existing tariffs filed and in force at the time. The commission, for good cause shown, may allow changes in rates, without requiring the 60 days notice, under such conditions as it may prescribe.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0320PN0277 - 2 - 12345678910111213